test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_hillo_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:

  Noun - hillo:
    hillo+N+Sg+Nom:  hillo
    hillo+N+Sg+Gen:  hiˊḷo
    hillo+N+Sg+Acc:  hiˊḷo
    hillo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiiḷon
    hillo+N+Sg+Loc:  hilloost
    hillo+N+Sg+Com:  hilloin
    hillo+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊḷottáá
    hillo+N+Ess:  hillon
    hillo+N+Par:  hillod
    hillo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiˊḷoh
    hillo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiˊḷoi
    hillo+N+Pl+Acc:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Ill:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiˊḷoin
    hillo+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊḷoiguin
    hillo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊḷoittáá

  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: miˊḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: miˊḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miiḷon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miˊḷottáá
    millo+N+Ess:    millon
    millo+N+Par:    millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miˊḷoh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miˊḷoi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: miˊḷoin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miˊḷoiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miˊḷoittáá

  Noun - humo: 
    humo+N+Sg+Nom:  huˊṃo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill:  huˊṃon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc:  huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Sg+Abe:  huˊmottáá
    humo+N+Ess:  hummoon
    humo+N+Par:  hummood
    humo+N+Pl+Nom:  huˊmoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen:  huˊmoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc:  huˊmoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill:  huˊmoid
    humo+N+Pl+Loc:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com:  huˊmoiguin
    humo+N+Pl+Abe:  huˊmoittáá
  
 
 
 
